test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vashk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vašk: # Noun 78 'eng /est vask/fin' - full paradigm
     vašk+N+Sg+Nom: vašk
     vašk+N+Sg+Gen: vask
     vašk+N+Sg+Par: vaskõ
     vašk+N+Sg+Dat: vaskõn
     vašk+N+Sg+Ins: vaskõks
     vašk+N+Sg+Ill: vaskõ
     vašk+N+Sg+Ela: vaskstõ
     vašk+N+Pl+Nom: vaskūd
     vašk+N+Pl+Gen: vaskūd
     vašk+N+Pl+Par: vaskīdi
     vašk+N+Pl+Dat: vaskūdõn
     vašk+N+Pl+Ins: vaskūdõks
     vašk+N+Pl+Ill: vaskīž
     vašk+N+Pl+Ela: vaskīst
